Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 35

Fraud, Theft or Destruction of Property

65-35-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Owner” means the owner of any property, any part owner, joint owner, tenant in common, joint tenant or tenant by the entirety of the whole or a part of any structure which is capable of receiving service by a utility;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, firm, company, partnership, association or organization of any kind, public or private;

“Tenant or occupant” means any person who occupies the whole or a part of any building, whether alone or with others, and includes the owner;

“Utility” means any person, municipality, county, cooperative, board, commission, district or any entity created or authorized by public act, private act or general law to provide electricity, natural gas, water, sanitary sewer service, telephone service, or any combination thereof, for sale to consumers in any particular service area, whether or not regulated by the Tennessee public utility commission; and

“Utility customer” means:

The person or persons listed on the records of the utility as the customer liable for charges or payment for the utility service;

The person or persons residing in the structure where utility services have been connected without permission or authorization of the utility; or

The manager, superintendent, officer or other responsible official of a corporation, partnership, proprietorship, association or other business organization that is listed on the records of the utility as the customer liable for charges for utility service or acting in behalf of a corporation, partnership, proprietorship, association or other business organization where utility services have been connected without permission or authorization of the utility.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 42; 1997, ch. 116, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 69.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-35-102. Prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for a person to:

Knowingly tap, cut, burn, break down, injure, destroy or otherwise interrupt or interfere with the current, lines, cables, poles, towers, fixtures or appliances utilized to furnish service to the general public by any telephone or telegraph company, or electric light or power company engaged in furnishing communication, light, heat or power by electricity; or

In any way injure, remove, destroy or interfere with any gas, sanitary sewer, or water fixtures or appliances;

Obtain or attempt to obtain, by the use of any fraudulent scheme, device, means or method, telephone or telegraph service or the transmission of a message, signal or other communication by telephone or telegraph, or over telephone or telegraph facilities with intent to avoid payment of the lawful price, charge or toll therefor, or for any person to cause another to avoid such payment for such service, or for any person for the purpose of avoiding payment, to conceal or to assist another to conceal from any supplier of telecommunication service or from any lawful authority the existence or place of origin or of destination of any telecommunication, or for any person to assist another in avoiding payment for such service, either through the making of multiple applications for service at one (1) address, or otherwise;

Obtain or attempt to obtain by use of any fraudulent scheme, device, means or method, electric, sanitary sewer, water, or gas service, with intent to avoid payment of the lawful price, charge or toll therefor, or for any person to cause another to avoid such payment for such service, or for any person to assist another in avoiding payment for electric, sanitary sewer, water, or gas service, either through the making of multiple applications for service at one (1) address, or otherwise;

Divert or use electrical power with the intent to defraud or deprive any public or private electric power supplier from receiving proper charges or payment for such electrical power; or

Commit any of the following acts which would make gas, electricity, telephone, sanitary sewer service, or water available to tenant or occupant by committing any of the acts:

Connect any tube, pipe, wire or other instrument with any meter, device or other instrument used for conducting telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water in such a manner as to permit the use of the telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water without same passing through a meter or other instrument recording the usage for billing;

Alter, injure or prevent the action of a meter, valve, stopcock, or other instrument used for measuring quantities of telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water;

Break, deface or cause to be broken or defaced any seal, locking device or other parts that make up a metering device for recording usage of telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water or a security system for such recording device;

Remove a metering device for measuring quantities of telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water;

Transfer from one (1) location to another a metering device for measuring utilities of telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water;

Use a metering device belonging to the utility that has not been assigned to the location and installed by the utility;

Adjust the indicated consumption, jam the measuring device, bypass the meter or measuring device with a jumper so that it does not indicate use or registers incorrectly or otherwise obtain quantities of telephone, gas, electricity, sanitary sewer service, or water from the utility without same passing through a metering device for measuring quantities of consumption for billing; or

Fabricate or use a device to pick or otherwise tamper with the locks used to deter electric current diversion, telephone diversion, gas diversion, water diversion, sanitary sewer service diversion, meter tampering and meter thefts.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 2; 1997, ch. 116, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Destruction or interference with utility lines, fixtures or appliances, § 39-14-411.

Theft of services, § 39-14-104.

65-35-103. Evidence of violation.

Any property on which it is found to have telephone, electric, gas, sanitary sewer, or water utilities tampered with in violation of § 65-35-102, and capable of receiving telephone, electricity, gas, sanitary sewer, or water service as a result of the use of any method of diversion prohibited in that section, is prima facie evidence and creates against the tenant or occupant a presumption of intent to tamper or divert in violation of § 65-35-102.

The presence upon property served by a utility of a metering device altered to improperly monitor the amount of utility service used on or by such property is presumptive evidence that the utility customer has diverted or used utility service with the intent to deprive or defraud the utility from receiving proper charges or payment for such utility service in violation of this chapter.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 3; 1997, ch. 116, § 5.

65-35-104. Civil liability — Damages — Liens — Perfection of liens.

Any person violating § 65-35-102 is liable civilly for damages resulting from such violation, including actual, compensatory, incidental and punitive damages.

The damages shall be three (3) times the utility's estimated loss of revenue, plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs associated with such loss.

A finding of guilt in violation of § 65-35-102, as part of an action brought to impose the penalties under § 39-14-104, is conclusive evidence of liability for civil damages recoverable under this chapter in any court of appropriate jurisdiction in a proceeding to assess civil damages against the guilty party.

Regardless of any criminal charge or lack thereof, any utility may nevertheless bring a civil action in any court of appropriate jurisdiction against the owner, occupant or tenant and allege the violation of any of the acts prohibited by § 65-35-102; and upon a finding that the person has violated § 65-35-102, the court shall likewise determine the estimated loss of revenues and award judgment for sums specified in subsections (a) and (b).

Any utility that can properly establish the amount of utility service fraudulently taken on or by any premises occupied by the owner thereof shall have the right to declare a lien for the value of such utility service against the property on which the utility service was taken.

The lien shall be filed within one (1) year of the date of the utility's first actual knowledge of the fraudulently diverted utility service.

The lien shall be perfected upon the filing of a notice with the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property upon which the lien is claimed is located, and such lien shall be second only to liens of the state, county, or municipality for taxes and special assessments, and any valid lien, right, or interest in such property duly recorded or duly perfected by filing, prior to the filing of such notice. Such notice shall contain the name of the titleholder or titleholders of the property upon which the lien is claimed, the property address, a description of the property sufficient to identify it, the signature and address of the entity claiming the lien, and the amount claimed by such entity.

The priority of liens established by this subdivision (e)(3) shall apply to all liens filed pursuant to this subsection (e) on or after April 10, 1990.

If a utility has not registered the notice as provided in subdivision (e)(3), such lien shall not be effective against a bona fide purchaser for value without actual or constructive knowledge of the fraudulently diverted utility service.

Civil actions pursuant to this section shall be commenced within the time required by law in an action to recover damages for the loss of property.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 4; 1991, ch. 47, §§ 1-3; 1991, ch. 220, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Limitation of actions for property tort actions, § 28-3-105.

65-35-105. Criminal proceedings.

A violation of § 65-35-102 is also a violation of § 39-14-104 and § 65-35-103 applies to any proceeding brought to impose the penalties for a violation of § 39-14-104.

In all criminal proceedings brought to impose penalties under § 39-14-104 for violation of this chapter, the provisions of § 65-35-103 pertaining to “prima facie evidence,” “presumption of intent” and “presumptive evidence” shall be deemed to be an inference of such evidence or intent.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 5.

65-35-106. Civil remedies and criminal penalties mutually exclusive.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the civil remedies of this chapter and the criminal penalties imposed by any other act of the general assembly are mutually exclusive methods for the prosecution of the unlawful activities described in the respective statutes.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 6.

65-35-107. Regulatory jurisdiction not extended.

Nothing in this chapter confers upon the Tennessee public utility commission the jurisdiction to regulate any utility not expressly subject to regulation by other provision of state law.

Acts 1990, ch. 851, § 7; 1995, ch. 305, § 43; 2017, ch. 94, § 70.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.